California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(5) In the case of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates a business that qualifies as both a new business and an eligible small business under this section, that business shall be treated as a new business for the first three taxable years of the new business.

(6) In the case of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates more than one business, and more than one of those businesses qualifies as either a new business or an eligible small business under
 this section, paragraph (2) shall be applied first, except that if there is any remaining portion of the net operating loss after application of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of that paragraph, paragraph (3) shall be applied to the remaining portion of the net operating loss as though that remaining portion of the net operating loss constituted the entire net operating loss.

(7) For purposes of this section, the term “net loss” means the amount of net loss after application of Sections 465 and 469 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 172(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to years to which the loss may be carried, is modified as follows:

(1) Net operating loss carrybacks shall not be allowed for any net
 operating losses attributable to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018, and before January 1, 2013.

(2) A net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2019, shall be a net operating loss carryback to each of the two taxable years preceding the taxable year of the loss in lieu of the number of years provided therein.

(A) For a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2014, the amount of carryback to any taxable year shall not exceed 50 percent of the net operating loss.

(B) For a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before
 January 1, 2015, the amount of carryback to any taxable year shall not exceed 75 percent of the net operating loss.

(C) For a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2019, the amount of carryback to any taxable year shall not exceed 100 percent of the net operating loss.

(3) A net operating loss carryback shall not be carried back to any taxable year beginning before January 1, 2011.

(d) (1) (A) For a net operating loss for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before January 1, 2000, Section 172(b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply as it read on January 1, 2015, and is
 modified to substitute “five taxable years” in lieu of “20 taxable years” except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(B) For a net operating loss for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2008, Section 172(b)(1)(A)(ii)(I) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to substitute “10 taxable years” in lieu of “20 taxable years.”

(C) Section 172(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to years to which loss may be carried, shall not apply.

(D) Section 172(b)(1)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for losses arising in 2018, 2019, and 2020, shall not apply.

(2) For any taxable year
 beginning before January 1, 2000, in the case of a “new business,” the “five taxable years” in paragraph (1) shall be modified to read as follows:

(A) “Eight taxable years” for a net operating loss attributable to the first taxable year of that new business.

(B) “Seven taxable years” for a net operating loss attributable to the second taxable year of that new business.

(C) “Six taxable years” for a net operating loss attributable to the third taxable year of that new business.

(3) For any carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by Section 17276.3, the carryover period specified in this subdivision shall be extended as follows:

(A) By one year for a net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning in 1991.

(B) By two years for a net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning before January 1, 1991.

(4) The net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before January 1, 1994, shall be a net operating loss carryover to each of the 10 taxable years following the year of the loss if it is incurred by a taxpayer that is under the jurisdiction of the court in a Title 11 or similar case at any time during the income year. The loss carryover provided in the preceding sentence does not apply to any loss incurred after the date the taxpayer is no longer under the jurisdiction of the court in
 a Title 11 or similar case.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Eligible small business” means any trade or business that has gross receipts, less returns and allowances, of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) during the taxable year.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (f), “new business” means any trade or business activity that is first commenced in this state on or after January 1, 1994.

(3) “Title 11 or similar case” shall have the same meaning as in Section 368(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) In the case of any trade or business activity conducted by a partnership or “S”
 corporation paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be applied to the partnership or “S” corporation.

(f) For purposes of this section, in determining whether a trade or business activity qualifies as a new business under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), the following rules apply:

(1) In any case where a taxpayer purchases or otherwise acquires all or any portion of the assets of an existing trade or business (irrespective of the form of entity) that is doing business in this state (within the meaning of Section 23101), the trade or business thereafter conducted by the taxpayer (or any related person) shall not be treated as a new business if the aggregate fair market value of the acquired assets (including real, personal, tangible, and intangible property) used by the taxpayer (or any
 related person) in the conduct of its trade or business exceeds 20 percent of the aggregate fair market value of the total assets of the trade or business being conducted by the taxpayer (or any related person). For purposes of this paragraph only, the following rules apply:

(A) The determination of the relative fair market values of the acquired assets and the total assets shall be made as of the last day of the first taxable year in which the taxpayer (or any related person) first uses any of the acquired trade or business assets in its business activity.

(B) Acquired assets that constituted property described in Section 1221(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code in the hands of the transferor shall not be treated as assets acquired from an existing trade or business, unless those assets
 also constitute property described in Section 1221(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code in the hands of the acquiring taxpayer (or related person).

(2) In a case in which a taxpayer (or any related person) is engaged in one or more trade or business activities in this state, or has been engaged in one or more trade or business activities in this state within the preceding 36 months (“prior trade or business activity”), and thereafter commences an additional trade or business activity in this state, the additional trade or business activity shall only be treated as a new business if the additional trade or business activity is classified under a different division of the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 edition, than are any of the taxpayer’s (or any related
 person’s) current or prior trade or business activities.

(3) In a case in which a taxpayer, including all related persons, is engaged in trade or business activities wholly outside of this state and the taxpayer first commences doing business in this state (within the meaning of Section 23101) after December 31, 1993 (other than by purchase or other acquisition described in paragraph (1)), the trade or business activity shall be treated as a new business under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(4) In a case in which the legal form under which a trade or business activity is being conducted is changed, the change in form shall be disregarded and the determination of whether the trade or business activity is a new business shall be made by treating the taxpayer as having purchased
 or otherwise acquired all or any portion of the assets of an existing trade or business under the rules of paragraph (1).

(5) “Related person” shall mean any person that is related to the taxpayer under either Section 267 or 318 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) “Acquire” shall include any gift, inheritance, transfer incident to divorce, or any other transfer, whether or not for consideration.

(7) (A) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997, the term “new business” shall include any taxpayer that is engaged in biopharmaceutical activities or other biotechnology activities that are described in Codes 2833 to 2836, inclusive, of the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) Manual
 published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 edition, and as further amended, and that has not received regulatory approval for any product from the Food and Drug Administration.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph:

(i) “Biopharmaceutical activities” means those activities that use organisms or materials derived from organisms, and their cellular, subcellular, or molecular components, in order to provide pharmaceutical products for human or animal therapeutics and diagnostics. Biopharmaceutical activities make use of living organisms to make commercial products, as opposed to pharmaceutical activities that make use of chemical compounds to produce commercial products.

(ii) “Other
 biotechnology activities” means activities consisting of the application of recombinant DNA technology to produce commercial products, as well as activities regarding pharmaceutical delivery systems designed to provide a measure of control over the rate, duration, and site of pharmaceutical delivery.

(g) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, a deduction shall be allowed to a “qualified taxpayer” as provided in Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, and 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, and Sections 17276.1, 17276.4, and 17276.7.

(h) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe appropriate regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations necessary to prevent the avoidance of the purposes of this section through splitups,
 shell corporations, partnerships, tiered ownership structures, or otherwise.

(i) The Franchise Tax Board may reclassify any net operating loss carryover determined under either paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) as a net operating loss carryover under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) upon a showing that the reclassification is necessary to prevent evasion of the purposes of this section.

(j) Except as otherwise provided, the amendments made by Chapter 107 of the Statutes of 2000 apply to net operating losses for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 14.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.1.

(a) A qualified taxpayer, as defined in Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, and 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, and Sections 17276.1, 17276.4, and 17276.7, may elect to take the deduction provided by Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the net operating loss deduction, as modified by Section 17276, with the following exceptions:

(1) Subdivision (a) of Section 17276, relating to years in which allowable losses are sustained, shall not be applicable.

(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 17276, relating to the 50-percent reduction of losses, shall not be applicable.

(b) The election to compute the net operating loss under this section shall be made in a statement attached to the original return, timely filed for the year in which the net operating loss is incurred and shall be irrevocable. In addition to the exceptions specified in subdivision (a), the provisions of Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, and 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, or Sections 17276.1, 17276.4, and 17276.7, as appropriate, shall be applicable.

(c) Any carryover of a net operating loss sustained by a qualified taxpayer, as defined in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 17276.2 as that section read immediately prior to January 1, 1997, shall, if previously elected, continue to be a deduction, as provided in subdivision (a), applied as if the provisions of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 17276.2, as that section read
 prior to January 1, 1997, still applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 15.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, and 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, and Sections 17276, 17276.1, 17276.4, and 17276.7, as well as Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, no net operating loss deduction shall be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004.

(b) For any carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, shall be extended as follows:

(1) By one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2003.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 16.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.4.

(a) The term “qualified taxpayer” as used in Section 17276.1 includes a person or entity engaged in the conduct of a trade or business within the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone designated pursuant to Section 7102 of the Government Code. For purposes of this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(1) A net operating loss shall not be a net operating loss carryback for any taxable year, and a net operating loss for any taxable year beginning on or after the date the area in which the taxpayer conducts a trade or business is designated the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone shall be a net operating loss carryover to each following taxable year that ends before the Los Angeles Revitalization
 Zone expiration date or to each of the 15 taxable years following the taxable year of loss, if longer.

(2) “Net operating loss” means the loss determined under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, as modified by Section 17276.1, attributable to the taxpayer’s business activities within the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone (as defined in Section 7102 of the Government Code) prior to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone expiration date. The attributable loss shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11, modified as follows:

(A) Loss shall be apportioned to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone by multiplying total loss from the business by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property
 factor plus the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is 2.

(B) “The Los Angeles Revitalization Zone” shall be substituted for “this state.”

(3) A net operating loss carryover shall be a deduction only with respect to the taxpayer’s business income attributable to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone (as defined in Section 7102 of the Government Code) determined in accordance with subdivision (c).

(4) If a loss carryover is allowable pursuant to this section for any taxable year after the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone designation has expired, the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone shall be deemed to remain in existence for purposes of computing the limitation set forth in paragraph (2) and allowing a net
 operating loss deduction.

(5) Attributable income shall be that portion of the taxpayer’s California source business income which is apportioned to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone. For that purpose, the taxpayer’s business income attributable to sources in this state first shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11. That business income shall be further apportioned to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 of Part 11, modified as follows:

(A) Business income shall be apportioned to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone by multiplying total California business income of the taxpayer by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus
 the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is 2.

(B) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone during the taxable year and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state during the taxable year.

(C) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid by the taxpayer in the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone during the taxable year for compensation, and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid by the taxpayer in this state during the taxable year.

(6) “Los Angeles Revitalization Zone expiration date” means the date the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone designation expires, is repealed, or becomes inoperative pursuant to Section 7102, 7103, or 7104 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall be inoperative on the first day of the taxable year beginning on or after the determination date, and each taxable year thereafter, with respect to the taxpayer’s business activities within a geographic area that is excluded from the map pursuant to Section 7102 of the Government Code, or an excluded area determined pursuant to Section 7104 of the Government Code. The determination date is the earlier of the first effective date of a determination under subdivision (c) of Section 7102 of the Government Code occurring after December 1, 1994, or the first effective date of an exclusion of
 an area from the amended Los Angeles Revitalization Zone under Section 7104 of the Government Code. However, if the taxpayer has any unused loss amount as of the date this section becomes inoperative, that unused loss amount may continue to be carried forward as provided in this section.

(c) A taxpayer who qualifies as a “qualified taxpayer” under one or more sections shall, for the taxable year of the net operating loss and any taxable year to which that net operating loss may be carried, designate on the original return filed for each year the section that applies to that taxpayer with respect to that net operating loss. If the taxpayer is eligible to qualify under more than one section, the designation is to be made after taking into account subdivision (d).

(d) If a taxpayer
 is eligible to qualify under this section and either Section 17276.2, 17276.5, or 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, as a “qualified taxpayer,” with respect to a net operating loss in a taxable year, the taxpayer shall designate which section is to apply to the taxpayer.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 17276, the amount of the loss determined under this section or Section 17276.2, 17276.5, or 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, shall be the only net operating loss allowed to be carried over from that taxable year and the designation under subdivision (c) shall be included in the election under Section 17276.1.

(f) This section shall cease to be operative on December 1, 1998. However, any unused net operating loss may continue to be carried over
 to following years as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 17.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.   Inoperative on December 1, 1998, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.7.

(a) The term “qualified taxpayer” as used in Section 17276.1 includes a person or entity that conducts a farming business that is directly affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors. For purposes of this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(1) A net operating loss shall not be a net operating loss carryback to any taxable year, and a net operating loss for any taxable year beginning on or after the date that the area in which the taxpayer conducts a farming business is affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors shall be a net operating loss carryover to each of the nine taxable years following the taxable year of loss, until used.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Net operating loss” means the loss determined under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, as modified by Section 17276.1, attributable to the taxpayer’s farming business activities affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors. That attributable loss shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11, modified for purposes of this subdivision, as follows:

(i) A loss shall be apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors by multiplying the total loss from the farming business by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is two.

(ii) “The area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors” shall be substituted for “this state.”

(B) A net operating loss carryover computed under this section shall be allowed as a deduction only with respect to the taxpayer’s
 farming business income attributable to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(C) Attributable income is that portion of the taxpayer’s California source farming business income that is apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors. For that purpose, that taxpayer’s farming business income attributable to sources in this state first shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11. That farming business income shall be further apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 of Part 11, modified for purposes of this subdivision as follows:

(i) Farming business income shall be
 apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors by multiplying the total California farming business income of the taxpayer by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is two. For purposes of this paragraph:

(I) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors during the taxable year, and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state during the taxable year.

(II) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the
 total amount paid by the taxpayer in the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors during the taxable year for compensation, and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid by the taxpayer in this state during the taxable year.

(ii) If a loss carryover is allowable pursuant to this section for any taxable year after Pierce’s disease and its vectors have occurred, the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors shall be deemed to remain in existence for purposes of computing the limitation set forth in subparagraph (B) and allowing a net operating loss deduction.

(b) A taxpayer who qualifies as a “qualified taxpayer” under one or more sections shall, for the taxable year of the net operating loss and any taxable year to which that net operating loss may
 be carried, designate on the original return filed for each year the section that applies to that taxpayer with respect to that net operating loss. If the taxpayer is eligible to qualify under more than one section, the designation is to be made after taking into account subdivision (c).

(c) If a taxpayer is eligible to compute its net operating loss under this section and any of Section 17276.2, 17276.5, or 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, or Section 17276.4, as a “qualified taxpayer,” with respect to a net operating loss in a taxable year, the taxpayer shall designate which section is to apply to the taxpayer.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 17276, the amount of the loss determined under this section or Section 17276.2, 17276.5, or 17276.6, as
 those sections read on November 30, 2014, or Section 17276.4, shall be the only net operating loss allowed to be carried over from that taxable year and the designation under subdivision (b) shall be included in the election under Section 17276.1.

(e) (1) A qualified taxpayer may utilize the net operating loss carryover allowed by this section only if the Department of Food and Agriculture confirms that the taxpayer’s farming business was affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors during the year for which the qualified taxpayer seeks a deduction under this section.

(2) To make the determination required by this subdivision, the Department of Food and Agriculture shall utilize the definitions in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to Pierce’s disease
 and its vectors.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall develop a management agreement with the cooperation of the Department of Food and Agriculture to establish procedures by which the Franchise Tax Board secures the information. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the Department of Food and Agriculture to confirm more than the fact that the taxpayer’s farming business was affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors during the year for which the qualified taxpayer seeks a deduction.

(f) This section applies to net operating losses attributable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2001, and before January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 18.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.21.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, and 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, and Sections 17276, 17276.1, 17276.4, and 17276.7, as well as Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, no net operating loss deduction shall be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2012.

(b) For any net operating loss or carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be extended as follows:

(1) By
 one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2011.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and before January 1, 2010.

(3) By three years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2009.

(4) By four years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2008.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a net operating loss deduction shall be allowed for carryback of a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2019.

(d) The provisions of this section do not apply to the following taxpayers:

(1) For a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2010, this section does not apply to a taxpayer with net business income of less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the taxable year. For purposes of this paragraph, business income means:

(A) Income from a trade or business, whether conducted by the taxpayer or by a passthrough entity owned directly or indirectly by the taxpayer. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “passthrough entity” means a partnership or an “S” corporation.

(B) Income from rental activity.

(C) Income attributable to a farming business.

(2) For a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2012, this section does not apply to a taxpayer with modified adjusted gross income of less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for the taxable year. For purposes of this paragraph, “modified adjusted gross income” means the amount described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17024.5, determined without regard to the deduction allowed under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 19.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.22.

Notwithstanding Section 17276.2, 17276.5, or 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, or Section 17276.1, 17276.4, or 17276.7 to the contrary, a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, shall be a net operating carryover to each of the 20 taxable years following the year of the loss, and a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2019, shall also be a net operating loss carryback to each of the two taxable years preceding the taxable year of loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 20.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.23.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 17276, 17276.1, 17276.4, 17276.7, and 17276.22, former Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, 17276.6, and 17276.20, and Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, a net operating loss deduction shall not be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022.

(b) For any net operating loss or carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be extended as follows:

(1) By one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2021.

(3) By three years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2020.

(c) This section shall not apply as follows:

(1) For a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022, this section shall not apply to a taxpayer with a net business income of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the taxable year.

(2) For a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022, this section shall not apply to a taxpayer with a modified adjusted gross income of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000)
 for the taxable year.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Business income” means any of the following:

(A) Income from a trade or business, whether conducted by the taxpayer or by a passthrough entity owned directly or indirectly by the taxpayer.

(B) Income from rental activity.

(C) Income attributable to a farming business.

(2) “Modified adjusted gross income” means the amount described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17024.5, determined without regard to the deduction allowed under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction.

(3) “Passthrough entity” means a partnership or an S corporation.

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 13.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.24.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, and 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, Section 17276.20, as that section read on December 31, 2015, Sections 17276, 17276.1, 17276.4, 17276.7, and 17276.22, and Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, a net operating loss deduction shall not be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2027.

(b) For any net operating loss or carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be extended as follows:

(1) By one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2025.

(3) By three years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2024.

(c) For a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2027, this section shall not apply to a taxpayer that has either of the following:

(1) Net business income of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the taxable year.

(2) Modified adjusted gross income of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the taxable year.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Business income” means any of the following:

(A) Income from a trade or business, whether conducted by the taxpayer or by a passthrough entity owned directly or indirectly by the taxpayer.

(B) Income from rental activity.

(C) Income attributable to a farming business.

(2) “Modified adjusted gross income” means the amount described in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17024.5, determined without regard to the deduction allowed under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction.

(3) “Passthrough entity” means a partnership or an “S” corporation.

(e) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026, this section shall not apply if, by May 14, 2025, the Director of Finance determines that General Fund money over the multiyear forecast is sufficient without the revenue impact of the net operating loss suspension and credit limitation, and
 pursuant to legislation in the annual Budget Act to not apply this section of law.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2027, this section shall not apply if, by May 14, 2026, the Director of Finance determines that General Fund money over the multiyear forecast is sufficient without the revenue impact of the net operating loss suspension and credit limitation, and pursuant to legislation in the annual Budget Act to not apply this section of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 21.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17278.

(a) To the extent specified in subdivision (b), there shall be allowed as a deduction to a taxpayer those payments of the taxpayer which are made pursuant to an interindemnity arrangement specified in Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code and which are paid to a trust of members of a cooperative corporation organized and operated under Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code and the members of which consist solely of physicians and surgeons licensed in this state.

(b) The deduction authorized by subdivision (a) shall be taken with respect to the taxable year in which the payment is made and shall be taken only to the extent that the payment does not exceed the amount which would otherwise be payable to an independent insurance company for similar coverage for medical malpractice insurance in that taxable year. Any portion of the payment in excess of that amount shall be treated as a payment under the interindemnity arrangement for five succeeding taxable years and may be carried forward as a deduction to those five succeeding taxable years until used. The deduction shall be applied first to the earliest years possible.

(c) In the event any payment is refunded by the trust to the taxpayer for any reason, the payment shall be included in the taxpayer’s income for the taxable year in which it is received to the extent that the payment or any
 portion thereof was taken as a deduction in any earlier taxable year.

(d) Any refund of a payment which is made by a trust to a taxpayer shall be reported by the trust to the Franchise Tax Board in the year in which the refund is made. The trust shall furnish the taxpayer with a copy of that report. In the case of any payment to be made to a taxpayer who is not a resident of the State of California in the year in which the refund is made, the Franchise Tax Board may, by regulation, require the trust to withhold an amount from the refund, determined by the Franchise Tax Board to reasonably represent the amount of tax due when that refund is included with other income of the taxpayer, and to transmit the amount withheld to the Franchise Tax Board at a time as it may designate. 

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Payment” means a contribution to or an assessment by an interindemnity arrangement described in Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code.

(2) “Taxpayer” means a physician or surgeon licensed in this state who is a participating member in an interindemnity arrangement described in Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code.

(3) “Trust” means a trust described in subdivision (a).

(f) Upon request, the trust shall submit to the Franchise Tax Board the names and membership dates of all participating doctors.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe those regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 17268 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1276, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1984.   Section applicable, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1276, during taxable years in which federal treatment is similar.)
-------------------------------------------

17278.5.
